Vermont, session 2025-2026, H192.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 5295 is added to read:
§ 5295. PROHIBITION ON SOLITARY CONFINEMENT FOR CHILDREN
(a) No solitary or room confinement shall be used on any child for
discipline, punishment, retaliation, or any other reason other than as a
VT LEG #380433 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.192
2025 Page 2 of 4
temporary response to behavior of a child who poses a serious and immediate
risk of physical harm to the child or any other person.
(b) A staff member of a facility shall attempt to use less restrictive
techniques before placing a child in solitary or room confinement. The
techniques shall include:
(1) attempting to de-escalate the situation by talking with the child; and
(2) permitting a qualified mental health professional to talk with the
child.
(c) After attempting to use less restrictive techniques as required by
subsection (b) of this section, a staff member of a facility may place a child in
temporary room confinement if the staff member:
(1) determines that the child’s behavior poses a serious and immediate
risk of physical harm to the child or another person;
(2) explains to the child the reasons for the room confinement; and
(3) informs the child that release from room confinement will occur:
(A) immediately when the child regains self-control such that the
child’s behavior no longer poses a serious and immediate risk of physical harm
to the child or another person; or
(B) not later than the time periods specified in subdivision (d)(2) of
this section.
VT LEG #380433 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.192
2025 Page 3 of 4
(d) If a child is placed in temporary room confinement pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section, the child shall be released:
(1) immediately when the child regains self-control such that the child’s
behavior no longer poses a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the
child or another person; or
(2) if the child does not regain self-control as described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection:
(A) not more than three hours after being placed in room
confinement if the child’s behavior poses a serious risk of physical harm to
others; or
(B) not more than 30 minutes after being placed in room confinement
if the child’s behavior poses a serious risk of physical harm to the child.
(e) Staff at the facility shall check on a child at least once every 15 minutes
while the child is in room confinement.
(f) If the child’s behavior continues to pose a serious and immediate risk of
physical harm to the child or another person after the expiration of the time
periods specified in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the child shall be
transferred to another facility or location where services other than room
confinement can be provided to the child.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
VT LEG #380433 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.192
2025 Page 4 of 4
(1) limit the use of single-person rooms or cells for the housing of
children in detention facilities and does not apply to regular sleeping hours.
Further, this section is not intended to apply to such situations where only one
child is housed within a detention facility; or
(2) conflict with any law providing greater or additional protections to
minors.
(h) As used in this section, “solitary confinement” or “room confinement”
means a form of physical separation in which the incarcerated child is placed
in a locked room or cell for approximately 20 hours or more out of a 24-hour
period. This includes administrative segregation and disciplinary segregation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380433 v.1